New York, session 2025-2026, S7660.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 23 of section 1604 of the education law, as 2 amended by chapter 269 of the laws of 1974, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 23. To contract with any person, corporation or other school district 5 for the conveyance of pupils residing within the district, when author- 6 ized to do so under subdivision nineteen of section two thousand twen- 7 ty-one of this chapter, by vote of the inhabitants of the district enti- 8 tled to vote, or to contract for the operation, maintenance and garaging 9 of motor vehicles owned by the district, in accordance with such rules 10 and regulations as such trustees may establish, consistent with the 11 regulations of the commissioner [of education]. Upon authorization by a 12 school district meeting, every such contract of transportation may be 13 made for a period not exceeding five years, notwithstanding any 14 provision of any other law inconsistent herewith. Notwithstanding any 15 provision of law to the contrary, any school district located within the 16 counties of Nassau and Suffolk with respect to contracts entered into 17 under this subdivision for the conveyance of pupils, where a district 18 intends to request a contractor remove a bus driver or driver's assist- 19 ant from service to such district, the district shall, prior to making 20 such request, provide the driver or driver's assistant with written 21 notice of its intent to seek such removal, stating the reasons therefor EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11789-04-6 S. 7660--A 2 1 including any supporting documentation, and shall afford such driver or 2 driver's assistant a reasonable opportunity to be heard before the 3 district issues a written removal or disqualification request to the 4 contracted company. Such notice and hearing requirements shall not apply 5 where the district determines, in its sole discretion, that the contin- 6 ued service of such driver or driver's assistant poses an immediate risk 7 to the safety or welfare of students. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 9 deemed repealed 3 years after such date.